North Dakota, session 69, SB2300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Schools - Personal electronic device storage - Secure container.
1. As used in this section, "personal electronic device" means an electronic device
belonging to a student, which is capable of transmitting voice, text, or data between
parties. The term includes a cell phone, tablet or laptop computer, smart watch, and a
gaming device.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a school with secure containers
to store each student's personal electronic device for the duration of a schoolday.
3. Upon arrival at the school, a student shall:
a. Turn off the student's personal electronic device.
b. Place the student's personal electronic device in the secure container in which
the personal electronic device must be stored for the schoolday.
4. A student may maintain possession of the secure container during the schoolday.
5. At the end of the schoolday, the personal electronic device may be released to the
student from the secure container.
6. A school principal may permit a student to access the student's personal electronic
device during the schoolday for a medical reason, if the parent or guardian of the
student provides the school principal with documentation certified by a medical
Page No. 1 25.0850.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
provider demonstrating the medical necessity for access to the personal electronic
device.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -
SECURE STORAGE OF A STUDENT'S PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE. There is
appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $1,890,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of providing schools with secure containers
for the storage of students' personal electronic devices during the schoolday, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.0850.03000